Iowa, session 2025-2026, HJR2.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 35 TLSB 1068YH (2) 91 sb/js H.J.R. 2 Section 1. STATE FISH DESIGNATED. The Iowa darter 1 (etheostoma exile) is designated and shall be officially known 2 as the state fish of Iowa. 3 Sec. 2. APPROPRIATE REPRESENTATIONS. The director of the 4 department of administrative services shall obtain appropriate 5 pictures and other representations of the Iowa darter and shall 6 display the pictures and representations in an appropriate 7 place in the state historical museum. 8 Sec. 3. OFFICIAL REGISTER. The editor of the Iowa official 9 register shall include an appropriate picture and commentary 10 of the Iowa darter in the Iowa official register, along with 11 the pictures of the state rock, state flower, state bird, and 12 state tree. 13